Hawaii statutes.
[§200-16.5] Responsibility of vessel owner;
evidence of unauthorized mooring. (a) In any proceeding for violation of
any statute or rule relating to the mooring of vessels, evidence of ownership
including:

(1) The state registration number;

(2) The documented name or number of a vessel; or

(3) Any other identifying name or number;

affixed to a vessel involved in the violation shall
create a presumption that the owner of the vessel was the person who unlawfully
moored or placed the vessel at the point where, and during the time when, the
violation occurred.

(b) A vessel owner may present competent
evidence that the vessel was sold, transferred, or stolen, or was moored or
placed in accordance with prior written permission of the State or due to an emergency
berthing condition to rebut the presumption established in subsection (a). [L
1996, c 188, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next